Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201818-1741.02
Handicapped parking
infraction; penalties; suspension of permit; fine.

(1) Any
person found guilty of a handicapped parking infraction shall be fined (a)
not more than one hundred fifty dollars for the first offense, (b) not more
than three hundred dollars for a second offense within a one-year period,
and (c) not more than five hundred dollars for a third or subsequent offense
within a one-year period.

(2) In addition to any fine imposed under subsection (1) of this section,
any person found guilty of a handicapped parking infraction under section 60-3,113.06
shall be subject to suspension of such person's handicapped or disabled parking
permit for six months and such other punishment as may be provided by local
ordinance. In addition, the court shall impose a fine of not more than two
hundred fifty dollars which may be waived by the court if, at the time of
sentencing, all handicapped or disabled parking permits issued to or in the
possession of the offender are returned to the court. At the expiration of
such six-month period, a suspended handicapped or disabled parking permit
may be renewed in the manner provided for renewal of the original permit.

Laws 1993, LB 632, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB524, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB163, § 9;

Laws 2014, LB657, § 2.